Illinois, session 104th, HB4457.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Gender 5Pricing Equity Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Business" means any business acting in this State that 8sells goods to any individual or entity, including, but not 9limited to, retailers, suppliers, manufacturers, and 10distributors.11    "Goods" means any consumer products used, bought, or 12rendered primarily for personal, family, or household 13purposes.14    "Substantially similar" means different goods that exhibit 15all of the following characteristics:16        (1) no substantial differences in the materials used 17    in production;18        (2) the intended use is similar;19        (3) the functional design and features are similar; 20    and21        (4) the brand is the same or both brands are owned by 22    the same individual or entity.23    For the purpose of this definition, a difference in   HB4457- 2 -LRB104 16461 SPS 29854 b1coloring among any of the goods shall not be construed as a 2substantial difference. 3    Section 10. Prohibition on gender discrimination in the 4sale of goods.5    (a) A person, firm, partnership, company, corporation, or 6business shall not charge a different price for any goods that 7are substantially similar if those goods are priced 8differently based on the gender of the individuals for whom 9the goods are marketed and intended.10    (b) Nothing in subsection (a) prohibits differences in the 11price of goods based specifically upon any of the following:12        (1) the amount of time it took to manufacture those 13    goods;14        (2) the difficulty in manufacturing those goods;15        (3) the cost incurred in manufacturing those goods;16        (4) the labor used in manufacturing those goods;17        (5) the materials used in manufacturing those goods; 18    or19        (6) any other gender-neutral reason for charging a 20    different price for those goods. 21    Section 15. Enforcement by Attorney General. A violation 22of any of the provisions of this Act is an unlawful practice 23under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. 24All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney   HB4457- 3 -LRB104 16461 SPS 29854 b1General by that Act shall be available to him or her for the 2enforcement of this Act. 3    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 4Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 5    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)6    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Gender Pricing Equity Act. A 7person who violates the Gender Pricing Equity Act commits an 8unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act.